Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-540
Immunization information; nondisclosure.

All immunization information
may be shared with the Department of Health and Human Services and entered
into the central data base created pursuant to section 71-541.01. A
patient or, if the patient is a minor, the patient's parent or legal guardian
may deny access under sections 71-539 to 71-544 to the patient's immunization
information by signing a nondisclosure form with the professional or entity
which provided the immunization and
with the department. The nondisclosure form shall be kept with
the immunization information of the patient, and
such immunization information is considered restricted immunization information.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 8.